src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
## Rules for cleaning up and composing end result

* Strengthening Consonant Cluster
* V shortening and C lengthening
* %^C2CC is generally used in conjunction with a preceding %^VV2V
* In verbs this will be observed in finite forms
* In derivational morphology, e.g. -škuetted, this is not the case

**Orthographic Consonant lengthening Weak to strong %{XC%}:Cx ** - used in
* *čââʹlmtẹ^1VOWm{XC}^C2CC>a*
* *čââʹlmtẹ0mm0>a*
kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Gen 
* *kaađnẹ%^1VOW{ʹØ}ǩ{XC}%^PALNo%^C2CC>a*
* *kaađnẹ00kk00>a*

**Orthographic Consonant lengthening Weak to strong %{XC%}:Cx for n and l** - used in

* *ma^1VOWnn^V2VV^VOWLower^CC2C*
* *mään0000*

* *puärˈr^VOWLower^CCC2C*
* *puär0000*

suâl+N+Sg+Nom **island**
* *suõlˈl^VOWLower^CCC2C*
* *suâl0000*

* *čââʹlmtẹ^1VOWm{XC}^C2CC>a*
* *čââʹlmtẹ0mm0>a*

kååvas+N+Sg+Nom: **kota**
* *kå^1VOWvvas^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *kååv0as0000*

kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Nom **tear**
* *kõ^1VOWnnjâl^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *kõõn0jâl0000*

suâl+N+Nom **island/saari**
* *suõlˈl^VOWLower^CCC2C*
* *suâl0000*

ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Nom **kilkura**
* *ǩeâlggal^Pen^XYY2XY*
* *ǩeâlǥ0al00*

* *dura^1VOWk{XC}^C2CC>a*
* *dura0kk0>a*
kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Ill:
* *kaađne^1VOWǩ{XC}^PALNo^C2CC>a*
* *kaađne0kk00>a*

čårrõs+N+Sg+Gen
* *čårrõ^1VOWs{XC}^V2VV^K2GG*
* *čårrõõzz00*

lookkmõš+N+Sg+Gen
* ★*lookkmõ^1VOWš{XC}^V2VV^K2GG* (is not standard language)
* ★*lookkmõ0žž00* (is not standard language)

čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen
* *čâustõ^1VOWk{XC}^V2VV^K2GG*
* *čâustõõǥǥ00*

čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen
* *čâustõ^1VOW0k{XC}^V2VV^PAL^K2GG*
* *čâustõõʹjj000*

## CONSONANT QUALITY CHANGE

### Pedagogical X3 length mark after diphthongs in vertical line ˈ

### Adding X3 length mark
**Consonant X3 lengthening after diphthong in vertical line ˈ character** - used in +N+Sg+Ill
**jeäll:jiâlˈlu,**
b c č ǯ d đ g ǧ k ǩ l m n p r s š t v also htˈt nˈnj
* *kuâl0l%^CC2CCC%>a*
* *kuâlˈl0%>a*

**Diphthong extra short marker in vertical line ˈ character** - used in +N+Sg+Ill
**ciâlkâlm:ciâˈlklmest**
ciâlkâlm+N+Pl+Gen:
* *ciâ{ˈ1}lkâlm^Pen^Allegro^RmVow>i*
* *ciâˈlk0lm000>i*

### Removing X3 length mark
**Removing Consonant X3 length mark after diphthong in vertical line ˈ LEFT ARROW** - deriving
b c č ǯ d đ g ǧ k ǩ l m n p r s š t v also htˈt nˈnj
```
```

**Removing Consonant X3 length mark after diphthong in vertical line ˈ LEFT ARROW** - $ Sakssa-jânnam

**Hyphen for splitting between look-alikes** - used in Kääzzkõsraajõstuâjj-joouk

Sakssajânnam+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: (∑) **Germany/Saksa**
* *Sakssa#jânnam*
* *Sakssa#jânnam*
* ★*Sakssa#jânnam* (is not standard language)
* ★*Sakssa-jânnam* (is not standard language)

tuâjj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#joukk+N+Sg+Nom:  **team/työryhmä**
* *tuâjj#joukk*
* *tuâjj%-joukk*
* ★*tuâjj#joukk* (is not standard language)
* ★*tuâjj#joukk* (is not standard language)
sääʹmm+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#musikk+N+Sg+Nom: **Skolt Sámi music/kolttamusiikki**
sää0mm%PAL%^CC2C%{-Ø%}#musikk
sääʹm000%-#musikk

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
